North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-57.2 Industrial Planning Surveys and Vocational Training

40-57.2-01.
Cities and counties may enter into agreements for surveys for industrial development and career and technical education and on-the-job training.

The governing body of any city or county of this state is authorized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to enter into contracts with any person, firm, association, corporation, or limited liability company for the purpose of obtaining site surveys and site development plans, structural and mechanical plans and surveys, market surveys, and similar plans and surveys relating to industrial development and plant location, design, construction, equipment, and operation. Similar contracts may be entered into by such political subdivisions in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for the providing of career and technical education and on-the-job training for residents of this state in industries located within this state. Such agreements shall be entered into only with a financially and educationally reliable person, firm, association, corporation, or limited liability company that has been approved for such agreement by a local development organization located in such city or county and organized to encourage industrial and commercial development and growth.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 386, § 1; 1993, ch. 92, § 11; 2003, ch. 138, § 84.

40-57.2-02.
Content of surveys.

The surveys permitted by this chapter shall consist of a detailed plan which may include, among such items required by the city or county, the following:

An evaluation of proposed sites, the various methods of utilization, and the suitability of the sites for industrial development for specific types of industry.

An evaluation of consumer demand for the various types of products that could be processed, assembled, fabricated, or manufactured by an industry or the different types of industry that could utilize the site, and the benefits to the city to be realized from each in terms of economic growth.

The available labor supply, skilled and unskilled, and what effect various types of industries would have on the supply.

Any other matters relating to planning, designing, and costs pertaining to plant buildings and plant equipment for specific plant location sites.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 386, § 2.

40-57.2-03.
Declaration of legislative intent.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislative assembly to promote the growth and development of small industry and to assist in the creation and expansion of local skills and talents in North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 386, § 3.

40-57.2-04.
City or county may provide funding.

Any city or county may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for career and technical education and on-the-job training services and surveys and otherwise implementing this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 386, § 4; 1983, ch. 593, § 30; 1983, ch. 606, § 50; 2003, ch. 138, § 85; 2015, ch. 439, § 56, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 56 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.